Utah statutes.
76-10-1502.   Legislative findings.

The legislature finds that the continued orderly operation of bus transportation is beneficial to the commerce of the state and to the convenience of its citizens; that it is essential to the comfort, safety and well-being of bus passengers that orderly conduct be maintained; that the promotion of bus transportation is beneficial to the economy of the state and conservation of energy; and that an increasing number of citizens avail themselves of this mode of transportation.

